Louisiana, session 2026, HB471.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1430 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1430. Unfair or deceptive trade practice or act; surveillance-based price
discrimination prohibited
A. For the purpose of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Automated decision system" means a system, software, or process that
uses computation, the result of which is used to assist or replace human
decision-making, including a system, software, or process derived from machine
learning, statistics, or other data processing or artificial intelligence techniques, and
excludes passive computing infrastructure.
(2) "Behaviors" means an individual's observable, measurable, or inferred
actions, habits, preferences, interests, or vulnerabilities, including the individual's
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1350 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 471
political, personal, or professional affiliations, web browsing history, IP addresses
used, locations frequented, purchase history, financial circumstances, consumer
behaviors, or inferences associated with a group, band, class, or tier of individuals
in which the individual belongs.
(3) "Biometrics" means data or information generated by the technological
processing, measurement, or analysis of a consumer's biological, physical, or
behavioral characteristics, which data or information can be processed for the
purpose of uniquely identifying an individual, including fingerprints, voiceprints,
scans or records of an eye retina or iris, facial maps, facial geometry, facial
templates, genetic information, or other unique biological, physical, or behavioral
patterns or characteristics.
(4) "Consumer" means an individual who uses, purchases, or leases goods
or services.
(5) "Individualized" means specific to or inferred about an individual or
group, band, class, or tier of individuals with particular personal characteristics,
behaviors, or biometrics.
(6) "Insurer" means an insurer with a certificate of authority or license issued
pursuant to provisions in R.S. 22:481 et seq.
(7) "Personal characteristics" means individual qualities, features, attributes
or traits, including immutable characteristics such as race and eye color, mutable
characteristics such as address, weight, citizenship, or parenthood status, and any
other personal identifying information, that could be used to uncover an individual's
identity, including a social security number, full name, or phone number.
(8) "Price" means the amount charged to a consumer in relation to a
transaction, including all related costs and fees and other material terms of the
transaction that have a direct bearing on the amount paid by the consumer or the
value of the good or service offered or provided to the consumer.
(9) "Surveillance data" means data obtained through observation, inference,
or surveillance of a consumer or worker that is related to personal characteristics,
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1350 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 471
behaviors, or biometrics of the individual or a group, band, class, or tier in which the
individual belongs, including information gathered, purchased, or otherwise
acquired.
B.(1) No person shall engage in surveillance-based price discrimination.
(2) A corporation or person has not engaged in surveillance-based price
discrimination if the person demonstrates any of the following:
(a) Differential prices are justified based on differences in cost in providing
a good or service to different consumers.
(b) Differential prices reflect discounts offered to all consumers on equal
terms in a manner consistent with applicable anti-discrimination laws, where all of
the following apply:
(i) The terms of the discount are available and accessible to consumers and
the public.
(ii) Discount reward membership uniformly to any consumer who is a
member in a particular group, including but not limited to active members of the
military, veterans, teachers, students, or senior citizens.
(iii) Any surveillance data used solely to offer or administer a discount is not
used for any other purpose, including profiling, targeted advertising, or
individualized price setting.
(iv) Eligibility for the discount is based on information affirmatively and
voluntarily provided by the consumer to the person offering the discount.
(v) Any loyalty program that allows a user to accrue and exchange points,
credits, or any similar nonmonetary system of value for a product or service does not
charge a different price for those points, credits, or similar nonmonetary system of
value to different consumers for the same or substantially similar product or service.
(vi) The person operates as an insurer pursuant to R.S. 22:481 et seq. and
associated rules and only inputs risk-relevant data into an automated decision system
that informs decisions related to the amount a consumer must pay for an insurance
policy or contract.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1350 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 471
(3) An entity or person has not engaged in surveillance-based price
discrimination if the person can demonstrate that a refusal to extend credit at specific
terms or the refusal to enter into a transaction with a specific consumer is based on
data provided in a consumer report covered by Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C.
1681 et seq.
C. A violation of this Section is grounds for a private right of action
according to R.S. 51:1409.